Utah statutes.
13-13-4.   Payment of percentage of receipts.
If an exhibitor is required by a license agreement to make any payment to the
distributor that is based on a percentage of the theatre box office receipts
the license agreement may not require a guarantee of a minimum payment to the
distributor or require the exhibitor to charge any per capita amount for
ticket sales.
